Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB620.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 701(a) of the act of July 28, 1988 (P.L.556, No.101), known as the Municipal Waste Planning, Recycling and Waste Reduction Act, is amended to read:Section 701. Recycling fee for municipal waste landfills and resource recovery facilities.(a) Imposition.--There is imposed a recycling fee of [$2] $5 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 per ton for all solid waste processed at resource recovery facilities and for all solid waste except process residue and nonprocessible waste from a resource recovery facility that is disposed of at municipal waste landfills. Such fee shall be paid by the operator of each municipal waste landfill and resource recovery facility.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0620PN0631 - 2 - 12345678